Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.380

Pending criminal prosecution in this state.

If a criminal prosecution has been instituted against such person under the laws of this state and is still pending the governor, in his or her discretion, either may surrender him or her on demand of the executive authority of another state or hold him or her until he or she has been tried and discharged or convicted and punished in this state.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1081; 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 19.]